lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 0 වුණේ .
SFX 2430 Y 1
SFX 2430 0 සැල් .
SFX 3665 Y 1
SFX 3665 0 රයටත් .
SFX 1474 Y 1
SFX 1474 0 ්‍යයෙන් .
SFX 1617 Y 1
SFX 1617 0 වකුගේ .
SFX 2323 Y 1
SFX 2323 0 ිත්වයක් .
SFX 4395 Y 1
SFX 4395 0 ්බරා .
SFX 4577 Y 1
SFX 4577 0 ෝපායන් .
SFX 4094 Y 1
SFX 4094 0 ගඟේ .
SFX 2556 Y 1
SFX 2556 0 ර්ට .
SFX 2001 Y 1
SFX 2001 0 ර්ථ .
SFX 661 Y 1
SFX 661 0 ියකින් .
SFX 2249 Y 1
SFX 2249 0 ෙකට .
SFX 1808 Y 1
SFX 1808 0 ෙකම .
SFX 3803 Y 1
SFX 3803 0 බිඳු .
SFX 3025 Y 1
SFX 3025 0 ූවන්ට .
SFX 2568 Y 1
SFX 2568 0 රියක .
SFX 225 Y 1
SFX 225 0 ෙක් .
SFX 3648 Y 1
SFX 3648 0 රියට .
SFX 554 Y 1
SFX 554 0 වීමටත් .
SFX 174 Y 1
SFX 174 0 ෙකි .
SFX 279 Y 1
SFX 279 0 ෙකු .
SFX 4634 Y 1
SFX 4634 0 ේරියා .
SFX 4251 Y 1
SFX 4251 0 ්වාදීන් .
SFX 4332 Y 1
SFX 4332 0 ්යාය .
SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118 0 ේත් .
SFX 2008 Y 1
SFX 2008 0 රියේ .
SFX 3639 Y 1
SFX 3639 0 රුත් .
SFX 4767 Y 1
SFX 4767 0 ුවෙලා .
SFX 3359 Y 1
SFX 3359 0 හරණයට .
SFX 3939 Y 1
SFX 3939 0 දියක් .
SFX 2041 Y 1
SFX 2041 0 මේදි .
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 මේදී .
SFX 3940 Y 1
SFX 3940 0 දියකු .
SFX 3301 Y 1
SFX 3301 0 ාධිකරණ .
SFX 1746 Y 1
SFX 1746 0 කරන්න .
SFX 2483 Y 1
SFX 2483 0 වැටිය .
SFX 3680 Y 1
SFX 3680 0 රගෙන .
SFX 2087 Y 1
SFX 2087 0 නොත් .
SFX 4591 Y 1
SFX 4591 0 ෝගයේ .
SFX 930 Y 1
SFX 930 0 ිමත් .
SFX 2473 Y 1
SFX 2473 0 විල් .
SFX 1956 Y 1
SFX 1956 0 විලි .
SFX 4820 Y 1
SFX 4820 0 ුරාට .
SFX 2690 Y 1
SFX 2690 0 නන්ගේ .
SFX 2419 Y 1
SFX 2419 0 සෙන්නේ .
SFX 486 Y 1
SFX 486 0 ඩ් .
SFX 987 Y 1
SFX 987 0 ඩා .
SFX 749 Y 1
SFX 749 0 ඩි .
SFX 2137 Y 1
SFX 2137 0 ඩු .
SFX 4030 Y 1
SFX 4030 0 ඩේ .
SFX 2764 Y 1
SFX 2764 0 ඩෝ .
SFX 4642 Y 1
SFX 4642 0 ේදීවත් .
SFX 641 Y 1
SFX 641 0 න්නන් .
SFX 154 Y 1
SFX 154 0 වරයා .
SFX 1230 Y 1
SFX 1230 0 බිමට .
SFX 729 Y 1
SFX 729 0 රාජ .
SFX 2383 Y 1
SFX 2383 0 ාන්තයට .
SFX 2822 Y 1
SFX 2822 0 කාරීත්වය .
SFX 1392 Y 1
SFX 1392 0 රාම .
SFX 2679 Y 1
SFX 2679 0 නාත්මක .
SFX 677 Y 1
SFX 677 0 බිම් .
SFX 668 Y 1
SFX 668 0 වලත් .
SFX 1403 Y 1
SFX 1403 0 බිමේ .
SFX 3651 Y 1
SFX 3651 0 රාව .
SFX 3650 Y 1
SFX 3650 0 රාළ .
SFX 2382 Y 1
SFX 2382 0 ාන්තයේ .
SFX 2738 Y 1
SFX 2738 0 තාවකින් .
SFX 3820 Y 1
SFX 3820 0 පුරයට .
SFX 3492 Y 1
SFX 3492 0 වාසීහු .
SFX 3045 Y 1
SFX 3045 0 ුවමින් .
SFX 2687 Y 1
SFX 2687 0 නමින් .
SFX 2831 Y 1
SFX 2831 0 කර්මය .
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 ගේත් .
SFX 2072 Y 1
SFX 2072 0 පුරයේ .
SFX 1606 Y 1
SFX 1606 0 වරුන්ගෙන් .
SFX 2880 Y 1
SFX 2880 0 ්ලකට .
SFX 3275 Y 1
SFX 3275 0 ායතන .
SFX 4495 Y 1
SFX 4495 0 ්තික .
SFX 2926 Y 1
SFX 2926 0 ්තිය .
SFX 4143 Y 1
SFX 4143 0 කලාව .
SFX 2879 Y 1
SFX 2879 0 ්ලක් .
SFX 1668 Y 1
SFX 1668 0 පයට .
SFX 1588 Y 1
SFX 1588 0 වුණත් .
SFX 1899 Y 1
SFX 1899 0 ානයක් .
SFX 3293 Y 1
SFX 3293 0 ානයකි .
SFX 3836 Y 1
SFX 3836 0 පයා .
SFX 2078 Y 1
SFX 2078 0 පයේ .
SFX 4338 Y 1
SFX 4338 0 ්‍යාඥයන් .
SFX 1348 Y 1
SFX 1348 0 ිච්චි .
SFX 1356 Y 1
SFX 1356 0 ාවන්ට .
SFX 1233 Y 1
SFX 1233 0 බත් .
SFX 4816 Y 1
SFX 4816 0 ුරුව .
SFX 3249 Y 1
SFX 3249 0 ාවන්ද .
SFX 4038 Y 1
SFX 4038 0 ටම් .
SFX 360 Y 1
SFX 360 0 ්වීම .
SFX 1468 Y 1
SFX 1468 0 ්වීය .
SFX 2427 Y 1
SFX 2427 0 සියට .
SFX 1076 Y 1
SFX 1076 0 යුතු .
SFX 2425 Y 1
SFX 2425 0 සියේ .
SFX 2288 Y 1
SFX 2288 0 ීයත්වය .
SFX 4936 Y 1
SFX 4936 0 ීමේදි .
SFX 1120 Y 1
SFX 1120 0 කමත් .
SFX 623 Y 1
SFX 623 0 ීමේදී .
SFX 2564 Y 1
SFX 2564 0 රුද .
SFX 3637 Y 1
SFX 3637 0 රුම .
SFX 753 Y 1
SFX 753 0 කයන්ට .
SFX 2123 Y 1
SFX 2123 0 තාවකට .
SFX 728 Y 1
SFX 728 0 රුව .
SFX 4705 Y 1
SFX 4705 0 ෙනහිර .
SFX 1368 Y 1
SFX 1368 0 වේදි .
SFX 198 Y 1
SFX 198 0 වේදී .
SFX 470 Y 1
SFX 470 0 තාවක් .
SFX 3995 Y 1
SFX 3995 0 තාවකි .
SFX 4656 Y 1
SFX 4656 0 ේගෙන .
SFX 2230 Y 1
SFX 2230 0 ේහි .
SFX 1677 Y 1
SFX 1677 0 නෙන් .
SFX 2800 Y 1
SFX 2800 0 ක්දැයි .
SFX 3735 Y 1
SFX 3735 0 යකින්ද .
SFX 3734 Y 1
SFX 3734 0 යකින්ම .
SFX 826 Y 1
SFX 826 0 ්නවුන් .
SFX 1079 Y 1
SFX 1079 0 යාමෙන් .
SFX 2164 Y 1
SFX 2164 0 ංගනී .
SFX 2063 Y 1
SFX 2063 0 බිමක් .
SFX 1253 Y 1
SFX 1253 0 ත්වයකට .
SFX 94 Y 1
SFX 94 0 වක .
SFX 1691 Y 1
SFX 1691 0 දීමක් .
SFX 2465 Y 1
SFX 2465 0 වුයේ .
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 0 වට .
SFX 1615 Y 1
SFX 1615 0 වත .
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 0 වද .
SFX 52 Y 1
SFX 52 0 වන .
SFX 213 Y 1
SFX 213 0 වම .
SFX 176 Y 1
SFX 176 0 වය .
SFX 408 Y 1
SFX 408 0 වර .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 වල .
SFX 182 Y 1
SFX 182 0 ත්වයක් .
SFX 3853 Y 1
SFX 3853 0 ඳා .
SFX 1236 Y 1
SFX 1236 0 ඳු .
SFX 1422 Y 1
SFX 1422 0 ත්වයකි .
SFX 2552 Y 1
SFX 2552 0 ලනවා .
SFX 1945 Y 1
SFX 1945 0 ව් .
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 0 වා .
SFX 1596 Y 1
SFX 1596 0 වැ .
SFX 597 Y 1
SFX 597 0 වයන් .
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 0 වි .
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 වී .
SFX 379 Y 1
SFX 379 0 වු .
SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76 0 වූ .
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 වෙ .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 0 වේ .
SFX 2454 Y 1
SFX 2454 0 වො .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 වෝ .
SFX 4539 Y 1
SFX 4539 0 ්ගොල්ල .
SFX 3619 Y 1
SFX 3619 0 ලන්තයේ .
SFX 4339 Y 1
SFX 4339 0 ්‍යාංශයේ .
SFX 1640 Y 1
SFX 1640 0 රාජ් .
SFX 4078 Y 1
SFX 4078 0 ගරුක .
SFX 2013 Y 1
SFX 2013 0 රාජා .
SFX 412 Y 1
SFX 412 0 දීත් .
SFX 2377 Y 1
SFX 2377 0 ාරත්න .
SFX 3783 Y 1
SFX 3783 0 මයකට .
SFX 3434 Y 1
SFX 3434 0 ශීලීව .
SFX 2177 Y 1
SFX 2177 0 ්වීමටත් .
SFX 343 Y 1
SFX 343 0 වෙනවා .
SFX 1083 Y 1
SFX 1083 0 මයක් .
SFX 2616 Y 1
SFX 2616 0 මයකි .
SFX 356 Y 1
SFX 356 0 යකුගේ .
SFX 424 Y 1
SFX 424 0 වරයාගේ .
SFX 4560 Y 1
SFX 4560 0 ්කාරි .
SFX 3439 Y 1
SFX 3439 0 ශයක් .
SFX 4485 Y 1
SFX 4485 0 ්තොට .
SFX 3547 Y 1
SFX 3547 0 වමට .
SFX 3934 Y 1
SFX 3934 0 දීවත් .
SFX 4082 Y 1
SFX 4082 0 ගන්වන .
SFX 364 Y 1
SFX 364 0 ාත් .
SFX 2509 Y 1
SFX 2509 0 වම් .
SFX 2510 Y 1
SFX 2510 0 වමු .
SFX 4081 Y 1
SFX 4081 0 ගන්වා .
SFX 4898 Y 1
SFX 4898 0 ුඩාවේ .
SFX 2444 Y 1
SFX 2444 0 ෂණය .
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 0 නායක .
SFX 3793 Y 1
SFX 3793 0 මං .
SFX 605 Y 1
SFX 605 0 මක .
SFX 3792 Y 1
SFX 3792 0 මග .
SFX 2060 Y 1
SFX 2060 0 මඟ .
SFX 50 Y 1
SFX 50 0 මට .
SFX 1229 Y 1
SFX 1229 0 මත .
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 0 මද .
SFX 2618 Y 1
SFX 2618 0 මම .
SFX 101 Y 1
SFX 101 0 මය .
SFX 2052 Y 1
SFX 2052 0 මල .
SFX 4015 Y 1
SFX 4015 0 ණුවක් .
SFX 3778 Y 1
SFX 3778 0 මව .
SFX 3776 Y 1
SFX 3776 0 මස .
SFX 71 Y 1
SFX 71 0 ම් .
SFX 639 Y 1
SFX 639 0 මා .
SFX 222 Y 1
SFX 222 0 මි .
SFX 3757 Y 1
SFX 3757 0 මී .
SFX 245 Y 1
SFX 245 0 මු .
SFX 2042 Y 1
SFX 2042 0 මෙ .
SFX 65 Y 1
SFX 65 0 මේ .
SFX 3743 Y 1
SFX 3743 0 මො .
SFX 1227 Y 1
SFX 1227 0 මෝ .
SFX 3333 Y 1
SFX 3333 0 ළා .
SFX 1573 Y 1
SFX 1573 0 ළි .
SFX 569 Y 1
SFX 569 0 ළු .
SFX 4220 Y 1
SFX 4220 0 ්වූයේය .
SFX 3329 Y 1
SFX 3329 0 ළේ .
SFX 3719 Y 1
SFX 3719 0 යමක් .
SFX 2480 Y 1
SFX 2480 0 වික්‍රම .
SFX 1312 Y 1
SFX 1312 0 ෙකින් .
SFX 4787 Y 1
SFX 4787 0 ුවමක් .
SFX 2306 Y 1
SFX 2306 0 ියෙමු .
SFX 585 Y 1
SFX 585 0 ුවලට .
SFX 3125 Y 1
SFX 3125 0 ියාවක් .
SFX 1135 Y 1
SFX 1135 0 ්නන්ගේ .
SFX 4085 Y 1
SFX 4085 0 ගනීවි .
SFX 2781 Y 1
SFX 2781 0 ගෙඩි .
SFX 2534 Y 1
SFX 2534 0 ල්වලට .
SFX 2028 Y 1
SFX 2028 0 යාවෙන් .
SFX 4007 Y 1
SFX 4007 0 තමයා .
SFX 2550 Y 1
SFX 2550 0 ලයින් .
SFX 4477 Y 1
SFX 4477 0 ්ථකයි .
SFX 2559 Y 1
SFX 2559 0 රූපය .
SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29 0 වලට .
SFX 723 Y 1
SFX 723 0 වලද .
SFX 2396 Y 1
SFX 2396 0 ාගනු .
SFX 1971 Y 1
SFX 1971 0 වලම .
SFX 1196 Y 1
SFX 1196 0 වලය .
SFX 1527 Y 1
SFX 1527 0 ිවුණා .
SFX 1567 Y 1
SFX 1567 0 ාදීන් .
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 0 වල් .
SFX 1603 Y 1
SFX 1603 0 වලා .
SFX 1381 Y 1
SFX 1381 0 වලු .
SFX 4428 Y 1
SFX 4428 0 ්නයට .
SFX 2105 Y 1
SFX 2105 0 දේශයේ .
SFX 622 Y 1
SFX 622 0 ුණත් .
SFX 1380 Y 1
SFX 1380 0 වශයෙන් .
SFX 512 Y 1
SFX 512 0 ්නයි .
SFX 2910 Y 1
SFX 2910 0 ්නයේ .
SFX 4458 Y 1
SFX 4458 0 ්දීම් .
SFX 1391 Y 1
SFX 1391 0 ලක .
SFX 104 Y 1
SFX 104 0 ලට .
SFX 1629 Y 1
SFX 1629 0 ලද .
SFX 601 Y 1
SFX 601 0 ලන .
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 0 ේවත් .
SFX 1211 Y 1
SFX 1211 0 ලම .
SFX 426 Y 1
SFX 426 0 ලය .
SFX 3620 Y 1
SFX 3620 0 ලන්ත .
SFX 4572 Y 1
SFX 4572 0 ්ක .
SFX 1774 Y 1
SFX 1774 0 ්ග .
SFX 1998 Y 1
SFX 1998 0 ලන්න .
SFX 2533 Y 1
SFX 2533 0 වකගේ .
SFX 1106 Y 1
SFX 1106 0 ටුව .
SFX 285 Y 1
SFX 285 0 ්ට .
SFX 215 Y 1
SFX 215 0 ්ඩ .
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 0 ්ණ .
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 0 ්ත .
SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 0 ්ද .
SFX 58 Y 1
SFX 58 0 ්න .
SFX 2198 Y 1
SFX 2198 0 ්ප .
SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 0 ්ම .
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 0 ්ය .
