lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
අකා/11,243,639,1071,1583,3665
උදා/33,36,39,45,52,64,76,86,87,88,131,156,177,181,189,212,217,218,293,294,298,343,379,389,457,555,565,595,612,644,861,991,1047,1048,1185,1193,1575,1584,1613,1643,1946,3359,3360
කුරු/1236,1404,1579,2045,3740,4094
ක්‍රම/2,6,11,12,13,15,19,21,26,27,29,30,38,39,43,46,48,53,60,62,70,123,128,199,295,296,390,444,589,1037,1038,1200,1399,3446,4577,4578
ගමන/1,2,3,4,5,6,17,18,20,21,22,23,28,32,34,60,85,99,109,147,152,153,174,228,254,269,271,516,755,830,1036,1283,1299,1300,1490,1773,1778,1898,2224,2383,2954,4566
ගස්/2,10,19,26,29,30,35,156,1185,1958,2483
ගොන්/292,987,1108
තරග/2,7,13,15,19,21,26,27,29,30,38,43,46,48,60,66,139,166,185,226,236,250,252,371,414,493,530,993,994,1034,1451,1559,1605,1736,1737,1882,1883,1959,1968,2153,2366,2597,2609,2822,3500,3559,3683,4125
තුල/1,8,12,14,18,20,25,42,127,196,251,302,412,714,1245,1360,2679
දීග/3,102,117,869,2249
නොදුන්/2087
පැට්‍රිමොනිටර්/154,232,249
පැහැ/2,13,19,21,25,27,48,52,122,125,181,206,219,532,610,1251,1691,2580,2628,3680
පුංචි/8,309,3650
පෘෂ්ඨ/2,13,15,19,21,30,48,51,114,930
පොතු/853,2473
බාර/3,5,10,16,19,21,25,42,63,76,87,90,125,204,236,260,347,358,366,454,484,506,534,535,560,582,752,756,897,976,1689,1758,2410,2713,3907,3925,4395
බැල/16,18,24,42,51,83,102,114,121,140,147,207,211,216,220,241,262,326,374,462,463,654,917,1026,1313,1314,1315,1476,1477,1813,2082,3025,3040,4747,4771,4788
බිලිය/486
බ්‍රිතාන්‍ය/1049,1474
මවු/1,9,56,91,93,132,168,232,334,482,877,960,1184,1230,1403,1447,1627,1663,2636,2732,3609
මහත්තය/1,3,6,11,20,31,79,104,129,151,221,225,266,436,473,500,697,1068,1819,1902,2562
මානව/146,200,321,421,684,2137,2339
මාර/16,17,19,20,24,27,47,74,83,180,207,221,301,361,364,421,450,463,517,646,701,819,916,929,1002,1374,1485,1487,1881,2040,2079,2259,2941,3049,3088,4323,4363,4538,4767,4768,4770,4776,4910
මැදි/9,10,13,27,52,76,87,88,94,112,176,190,226,389,602,644,671,784,946,1375,2008,2917,3648,4452,4819,4948
මුඩු/86,392,677,1403
මුල්ල/1790,4633,4634
යුද්ධ/2,13,15,19,21,30,38,43,46,53,66,101,166,185,250,458,2387,3301
රූපවාහිනී/668,2774
ලබන්න/1,3,4,9,20,23,31,41,49,72,79,89,115,118,129,221,225,649
ලිය/4,7,9,11,17,20,24,33,35,56,69,79,82,83,87,103,144,161,165,206,216,240,241,247,257,287,393,445,571,586,670,679,704,740,802,834,835,885,961,1315,1321,1416,1594,1685,1821,1875,1876,1956,2272,2552,2704,3216,3220,3469,3788
වගාකරු/1617
වන්/1,117,122,454,3939,3961,3962
වැහි/56,69,532,742,2235,3803,4766
විකුණ/11,20,33,56,69,82,83,144,165,206,207,216,240,257,262,329,500,641,679,1225,1440,1569,3861
විට/2,4,6,8,11,12,17,18,25,100,109,144,228,251,271,503,531,902,1808,1860,3020
විමසු/10,35,36,50,65,71,105,327,345,391,431,553,735,1401,2041,3022
විවාහ/2,13,15,17,19,21,43,48,60,66,139,145,186,331,427,487,530,554,817,1954
විහාර/2,13,15,19,20,21,26,27,53,60,70,139,183,292,493,663,673,732,794,857,947,1039,1043,1049,1180,1365,1366,1392,1562,1723,1912,1923,1924,1925,1926,2413,3298,3299,3377,3494,4064
වෙල/3,4,5,6,11,42,1109,1315,1490,4286,4332,4689
වෙළෙඳ/9,948,2430,3896
සංඝ/47,90,146,433,729,962,3801,4098
සන්/86,196,818,1413,1687,2674,2698,4030
සමය/1,3,4,6,7,8,11,17,22,31,32,34,49,65,115,118,148,150,269,4642
සමා/10,37,45,54,380,595,669,749,1251,1436,1593,1693,1694,2001,2103,2577,2698,3448,3946
සම්/2764
සාද/2,5,11,15,19,20,33,35,43,66,82,103,144,243,406,489,630,851,1070,1175,1568,1903,1907,2390,2391,2395,2556,2557
සාර/2,10,20,21,30,39,51,60,167,169,179,187,288,496,624,646,661,771,940,944,1202,1248,1572,2923,2936,4476,4477,4478,4479,4482,4520,4552
සැල/5,32,42,59,76,80,86,102,131,145,155,209,230,253,272,298,365,570,948,1045,1555,1576,1577,1578,1734,1874,1932,1933,1934,1935,2150,2157,2197,2348,2361,2362,2419,2420,2805,2810,2815,3210,3212,3213,3391,3394,3395,3401,3404,4110
සිත්තර/51,155,174,231,473
සිදු/86,172,181,244,253,274,298,457,482,536,564,565,612,637,689,730,900,946,1013,1116,1273,1296,1446,1457,1644,1740,1746,2002,2152,2159,2206,2804,2813,2881,4114,4136,4138
සුවිශේෂ/11,16,42,51,73,114,137,182,259,302,1422,1839,2323
සොහොයුර/9,20,24,41,51,79,129,155,221,225,266,279,290,315,364,773,1853
ස්ටීවන්/749
හිමිකම/4251
